Alabama, session 2026rs, SB179.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
14 Section 1. Sections 19-3B-505 and 19-3B-816, Code of
15 Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
16 "§19-3B-505
17 (a) Whether or not the terms of a trust contain a
18 spendthrift provision, the following rules apply:
19 (1) During the lifetime of the settlor, the property of
20 a revocable trust is subject to claims of the settlor's
21 creditors.
22 (2) With Except as provided in Chapter 3E, with respect
23 to an irrevocable trust, a creditor or assignee of the settlor
24 may reach the maximum amount that can be distributed to or for
25 the settlor's benefit. If a trust has more than one settlor,
26 then the amount the creditor or assignee of a particular
27 settlor may reach may not exceed the settlor's interest in the
28 portion of the trust attributable to that settlor's
Page 1

portion of the trust attributable to that settlor's
SB179 Enrolled
29 contribution.
30 (3) After the death of a settlor, and subject to the
31 settlor's right to direct the source from which liabilities
32 will be paid, the property of a trust that was revocable
33 immediately prior to the settlor's death is subject to claims
34 of the settlor's creditors, costs of administration of
35 administering the settlor's estate, the expenses of the
36 settlor's funeral and disposal of remains, and the homestead
37 allowance, exempt property, and family allowance to a
38 surviving spouse and children, to the extent the settlor's
39 probate estate is inadequate to satisfy those claims, costs,
40 expenses, and homestead allowance, exempt property, and family
41 allowance.
42 (b) With respect to claims, expenses, and taxes in
43 connection with the settlement of a trust that was revocable
44 at the settlor's death:
45 (1) Any claim of a creditor which would be barred
46 against the fiduciary of a decedent's estate, the estate of
47 the decedent, or any creditor or beneficiary of the decedent's
48 estate, shall be barred against the trustee, the trust
49 property, and the creditors and beneficiaries of the trust.;
50 (2) A trustee at any time may give notice to any person
51 the trustee has reason to believe may have a claim against the
52 settlor at death. The notice shall contain the name and
53 address of the trustee to whom the claim must be presented. If
54 the person fails to present the claim in writing within 90
55 days from the date of the notice, then the person shall be
56 forever barred from asserting or recovering on the claim from
Page 2

forever barred from asserting or recovering on the claim from
SB179 Enrolled
57 the trustee, the trust property, and the creditors and
58 beneficiaries of the trust. Any person who presents a claim on
59 or before the date specified in the notice may not later
60 increase the claim following the expiration of the 90-day
61 period.;
62 (3) If a claim is not presented in writing to the
63 personal representative of the settlor's estate or to the
64 trustee: (i) within six months from the date of the
65 appointment of the initial personal representative of the
66 settlor's estate, or (ii) if no personal representative is
67 appointed within six months from the settlor's date of death
68 and a claim is not presented in writing to the trustee within
69 six months from the settlor's date of death, then no trustee
70 shall be chargeable for any assets that the trustee may pay or
71 distribute in good faith in satisfaction of any lawful claims,
72 expenses, or taxes or to any beneficiary before the claim was
73 presented. A payment or distribution of assets by a trustee
74 shall be deemed to have been made in good faith unless the
75 creditor can prove that the trustee had actual knowledge of
76 the claim at the time of the payment or distribution. The
77 six-month period shall not be interrupted or affected by the
78 death, resignation, or removal of a trustee, except that the
79 time during which there is no trustee in office shall not be
80 counted as part of the period.; and
81 (4) The provisions of Section 43-2-371 dealing with
82 regarding the priority of payment of claims, expenses, and
83 taxes from the probate estate of a decedent shall apply to a
84 revocable trust to the extent the assets of the decedent's
Page 3

revocable trust to the extent the assets of the decedent's
SB179 Enrolled
85 probate estate are inadequate.
86 (c) For purposes of this section:
87 (1) during During the period the power may be
88 exercised, the holder of a power of withdrawal is treated in
89 the same manner as the settlor of a revocable trust to the
90 extent of the property subject to the power; and
91 (2) upon the lapse, release, or waiver of the power,
92 the holder is treated as the settlor of the trust only to the
93 extent the value of the property affected by the lapse,
94 release, or waiver exceeds the greater of the amount specified
95 in Section 2041(b)(2), 2503(b), or 2514(e) of the Internal
96 Revenue Code of 1986, in each case as in effect on January 1,
97 2007, or as later amended.
98 (2) A beneficiary of an irrevocable trust who holds a
99 power of withdrawal is not a settlor of the trust upon the
100 lapse of the power;
101 (3) The power of a trustee of an irrevocable trust,
102 whether arising under the trust agreement or any other
103 provision of the law, to make a distribution to or for the
104 benefit of a settlor for the purpose of satisfying or
105 reimbursing, in whole or in part, the settlor for income taxes
106 paid or payable on all or any portion of the trust principal
107 and income that are includable in the settlor's personal
108 income under applicable law, as well as distributions made by
109 the trustee pursuant to such authority, shall not be
110 considered an amount that may be distributed to or for the
111 benefit of the settlor; and
112 (4) A person, including, but not limited to, a previous
Page 4

(4) A person, including, but not limited to, a previous
SB179 Enrolled
113 settlor of the trust, who becomes a beneficiary of a trust due
114 to the exercise of a power of appointment by someone other
115 than that person, shall not be considered a settlor of the
116 trust."
117 "§19-3B-816
118 (a) Without limiting the authority conferred granted by
119 Section 19-3B-815, a trustee may:
120 (1) collect Collect trust property and accept or reject
121 additions to the trust property from a settlor or any other
122 person, including, but not being limited to, the authority to
123 receive, collect, hold, and retain common or preferred stock
124 or other interests in the trustee or any related party;
125 (2) acquire Acquire or sell property, for cash or on
126 credit, at public or private sale;
127 (3) exchange Exchange, partition, or otherwise change
128 the character of trust property;
129 (4) deposit Deposit trust money in an account in a
130 regulated financial-service service institution;
131 (5) borrow Borrow money, with or without security, and
132 mortgage or pledge trust property for a period within or
133 extending beyond the duration of the trust;
134 (6) with With respect to an interest in a
135 proprietorship, partnership, limited liability company,
136 business trust, corporation, or other form of business or
137 enterprise, continue the business or other enterprise and take
138 any action that may be taken by shareholders, members, or
139 property owners, including merging, dissolving, or otherwise
140 changing the form of business organization or contributing
Page 5

changing the form of business organization or contributing
SB179 Enrolled
141 additional capital;
142 (7) with With respect to stocks or other securities,
143 exercise the rights of an absolute owner, including the right
144 to:
145 (A) votea. Vote, or give proxies to vote, with or
146 without power of substitution, or enter into or continue a
147 voting trust agreement;
148 (B) holdb. Hold a security in the name of a nominee or
149 in other form without disclosure of the trust so that title
150 may pass by delivery;
151 (C) payc. Pay calls, assessments, and other sums
152 chargeable or accruing against the securities, and sell or
153 exercise stock subscription or conversion rights; and
154 (D) depositd. Deposit the securities with a depositary
155 depository or other regulated financial-service service
156 institution;
157 (8) with With respect to an interest in real property,
158 construct, or make ordinary or extraordinary repairs to,
159 alterations to, or improvements in, buildings or other
160 structures,; demolish improvements,; raze existing or erect
161 new party walls or buildings,; subdivide or develop land,;
162 dedicate land to public use or grant public or private
163 easements,; and make or vacate plats and adjust boundaries;
164 (9) enter Enter into a lease for any purpose as lessor
165 or lessee, including a lease or other arrangement for
166 exploration and removal of natural resources, with or without
167 the option to purchase or renew, for a period within or
168 extending beyond the duration of the trust;
Page 6

extending beyond the duration of the trust;
SB179 Enrolled
169 (10) grant Grant an option involving for a sale, lease,
170 or other disposition of trust property or acquire an option
171 for the acquisition of to purchase property, including an
172 option exercisable beyond the duration of the trust trust's
173 duration, and exercise an option so acquired any such option;
174 (11) insure Insure the property of the trust against
175 damage or loss and insure the trustee, the trustee's agents,
176 and beneficiaries against liability arising from the
177 administration of the trust;
178 (12) abandon Abandon or decline to administer property
179 of no value or of insufficient value to justify its collection
180 or continued administration;
181 (13) with With respect to environmental law, exercise
182 those powers granted a fiduciary by applicable law;
183 (14) pay Pay or contest any claim, settle a claim by or
184 against the trust, and release, in whole or in part, a claim
185 belonging to the trust;
186 (15) pay Pay taxes, assessments, compensation of the
187 trustee and of employees and agents of the trust, and other
188 expenses incurred in the administration of the trust;
189 (16) exercise Exercise elections with respect to
190 federal, state, and local taxes;
191 (17) select Select a mode of payment under any employee
192 benefit or retirement plan, annuity, or life insurance payable
193 to the trustee, exercise rights thereunder, including exercise
194 of exercising the right to indemnification for expenses and
195 against liabilities, and take appropriate action to collect
196 the proceeds;
Page 7

the proceeds;
SB179 Enrolled
197 (18) make Make loans out of trust property, including
198 loans to a beneficiary on terms and conditions the trustee
199 considers to be fair and reasonable under the circumstances,
200 and the trustee has place a lien on future distributions for
201 repayment of those loans;
202 (19) pledge Pledge trust property to guarantee loans
203 made by others to the beneficiary;
204 (20) appoint Appoint a trustee to act in another
205 jurisdiction with respect to trust property located in the
206 other jurisdiction, confer upon the appointed trustee all of
207 the powers and duties of the appointing trustee, require that
208 the appointed trustee furnish security, and remove any trustee
209 so appointed;
210 (21)(A) pay a. Pay an amount distributable to a
211 beneficiary who is under a legal disability or who the trustee
212 reasonably believes is incapacitated, by paying it directly to
213 the beneficiary or applying it for the beneficiary's benefit,
214 or by:
215 1. paying Paying it to the beneficiary's conservator
216 or, if the beneficiary does not have a conservator, the
217 beneficiary's guardian;
218 2. paying Paying it to the beneficiary's custodian
219 under the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act or custodial trustee
220 under the Uniform Custodial Trust Act, and, for that purpose,
221 creating a custodianship or custodial trust;
222 3. if If the trustee does not know of a conservator,
223 guardian, custodian, or custodial trustee, paying it to an
224 adult relative or other person having legal or physical care
Page 8

adult relative or other person having legal or physical care
SB179 Enrolled
225 or custody of the beneficiary, to be expended on the
226 beneficiary's behalf; or
227 4. managing Managing it as a separate fund on the
228 beneficiary's behalf, subject to the beneficiary's continuing
229 right to withdraw the distribution.
230 (B) the b. The trustee shall not be under any duty to
231 see to responsible for ensuring the application of the
232 payment made pursuant to subparagraphs 1. to 4. above, so made
233 this subdivision if the trustee acted as a prudent person in
234 the selection of the person, including the minor or
235 incompetent, to whom the payments were made; and the receipt
236 of the person funds shall be full acquittance to the trustee.;
237 (22) on On distribution of trust property or the
238 division or termination of a trust, make distributions in
239 divided or undivided interests, allocate particular assets in
240 proportionate or disproportionate shares, value the trust
241 property for those purposes, and adjust for resulting
242 differences in valuation;
243 (23) resolve Resolve a dispute concerning the
244 interpretation of the trust or its administration by
245 mediation, arbitration, or other procedure for alternative
246 dispute resolution and to employ counsel, expert witnesses, or
247 other agents;
248 (24) prosecute Prosecute or defend an action, claim, or
249 judicial proceeding in any jurisdiction to protect trust
250 property and the trustee in the performance of the trustee's
251 duties and to employ counsel, expert witnesses, or other
252 agents;
Page 9

agents;
SB179 Enrolled
253 (25) sign Sign and deliver contracts and other
254 instruments that are useful to achieve or facilitate the
255 exercise of the trustee's powers;
256 (26) on On termination of the trust, exercise the
257 powers appropriate to wind up the administration of the trust
258 and distribute the trust property to the persons entitled to
259 it;
260 (27) create Create or join in the creation of a joint
261 venture, partnership, limited liability company, business
262 trust, corporation, or other form of business or enterprise,
263 continue the business or other enterprise and take any action
264 that may be taken by shareholders, members, or property
265 owners, including merging, dissolving, or otherwise changing
266 the form of business organization or contributing additional
267 capital;
268 (28) employ Employ and compensate persons deemed by the
269 trustee needful necessary to advise or assist in the proper
270 management and administration of the trust, including, but not
271 limited to, agents, auditors, including public accountants,
272 certified public accountants or internal auditors, brokers,
273 attorneys-at-law, attorneys-in-fact, investment bankers,
274 investment advisors, rental agents, realtors, appraisers, and
275 tax specialists, including any related party, so long as the
276 relationship and the fees charged are reasonable and disclosed
277 in any a reasonable manner to the current beneficiaries; and
278 to do so without liability for any neglect, omission,
279 misconduct, or default of the agent or representative,
280 provided the trustee acted as a prudent person in selecting
Page 10

provided the trustee acted as a prudent person in selecting
SB179 Enrolled
281 and monitoring the agent or representative. For purposes of
282 the immediately preceding sentence, compensation Compensation
283 charged by or paid to an affiliated business entity shall be
284 presumed to be reasonable if the compensation is consistent
285 with the published fee schedule maintained by the affiliated
286 business entity in the ordinary course of business;
287 (29) pay Pay any and all expenses reasonably necessary
288 for the administration of the trust including interest, taxes,
289 insurance premiums, assessments, agents' fees or compensation,
290 trustees' fees or compensation, including additional fees for
291 extraordinary services and fees to related parties, and other
292 expenses incurred in the collection, care, administration, and
293 protection of the trust estate; and
294 (30) in In addition to the investments authorized by
295 the document or any provision of law for the investment of
296 funds held by a trustee, the trustee may invest in and hold:
297 (i) interests, however evidenced, in any common trust fund or
298 other collective investment fund maintained by any national or
299 state chartered bank or trust company having trust powers; or
300 (ii) securities of or other interests in any open-end or
301 closed-end management type investment company or investment
302 trust so long as the portfolio of such common trust fund,
303 collective investment fund, or investment company or
304 investment trust consists of investments authorized with
305 respect to the trustee.
306 (b) Without limiting the authority granted by Section
307 19-3B-815, a trustee, who is neither related or subordinated
308 within the meaning of 26 U.S.C. §672(c), in the trustee's sole
Page 11

within the meaning of 26 U.S.C. §672(c), in the trustee's sole
SB179 Enrolled
309 discretion, may distribute to or for the benefit of the
310 settlor or other person treated as owner under the Internal
311 Revenue Code, all or any portion of the trust for the purpose
312 of satisfying or reimbursing, in whole or in part, the settlor
313 or such other person for the amount of any income taxes paid
314 or payable on all or any portion of the trust principal and
315 income which are includable in the settlor's or such other
316 person's personal income under applicable law.
317 (b)(c) Nothing contained in this section, insofar as
318 such authorization that may be prohibited by the Constitution
319 of Alabama of 1901 2022, shall authorize the investment of
320 trust assets in the stock of any private corporation."
321 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
322 1, 2026, and apply to all trusts in accordance with Section
323 19-3B-1204.
Page 12

19-3B-1204.
SB179 Enrolled
324
325
326
327
328
329
330 ________________________________________________
331 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
332
333
334
335 ________________________________________________
336 Speaker of the House of Representatives
337
338
339 SB179
340 Senate 17-Mar-26
341 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
342 the Senate.
343
344 Patrick Harris,
345 Secretary.
346
347
348
349
350 House of Representatives
351 Passed: 08-Apr-26
352
353
354
355
356 By: Senator Barfoot
Page 13